csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_Imp_am.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     waabandam+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamookan
     waabandam+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamookeg
     waabandam+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamookang
     waabandam+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandangen
     waabandam+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandangegon
     waabandam+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+0Sg: waabandanziidaa
     waabandam+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+0Pl: waabandanziidaanin
     waabandam+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandan
     waabandam+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [waabandamog,waabandamok]
     waabandam+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+0Sg: waabandandaa
     waabandam+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+0Pl: waabandandaanin
